District of Columbia statutes.
2-1402.72

Motor vehicle rental companies.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it shall not be an unlawful practice for a motor vehicle rental company to fail or refuse to rent a motor vehicle, or to impose differential terms and conditions upon the rental of a motor vehicle, based on the age of any person, where such action is reasonably related to accident risk or threat to public safety.

History

Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155, § 272
as added Oct. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 11-64, § 2(b), 42 DCR 4322

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2534.